West Virginia, session 2026, HB4062.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: Article 5. county board of education. §18-5-15h. West Virginia Homeschool Student Athletics Participation Act. (a) Short title. – This section shall be known as the "West Virginia Homeschool Student Athletics Participation Act."(b) Purpose. – The purpose of this section is to allow homeschool students who are participants of organized homeschool athletic teams to participate in interscholastic athletic competitions with West Virginia Secondary School Activities Commission (WVSSAC) member schools while ensuring that homeschool teams do not affect official WVSSAC rankings, standings, or postseason play.(c) Definitions. - For the purposes of this section:"Homeschool Student" – A student receiving an education in accordance with §18-8-1(c),(m), or (n) of this code through a home instruction program. "Homeschool Organization" – A recognized association or league of homeschool teams that provides oversight and governance for homeschool sports programs."WVSSAC" – The West Virginia Secondary School Activities Commission, the governing body for interscholastic athletics in the state."Member School" – A public or private school that is a recognized member of the WVSSAC.(d) Participation of homeschool organizations in interscholastic sports -(1) Homeschool students who are participants of a homeschool athletic organization shall be permitted to participate in regular-season interscholastic athletic contests against WVSSAC member schools, provided that:(A) The homeschool athletic organization with guidelines applicable to health, safety, and eligibility requirements are similar to those required of WVSSAC member schools.(B) The homeschool team agrees to abide by WVSSAC rules and policies concerning game conduct, officiating, and scheduling.(C) Any homeschool team participating shall provide proof of insurance coverage similar to WVSSAC member schools.(2) Homeschool organizations and teams participating under this section may not:(A) Be included in any official WVSSAC rankings, points systems, standings, or statistical records.(B) Be eligible for WVSSAC postseason competitions, including but not limited to sectionals, regionals, and state championships.(C) Affect the official record, win-loss tally, or statistical standings of WVSSAC member schools, though results of contests may be recorded separately for historical purposes.(3) A WVSSAC member school may voluntarily choose whether to schedule games against a homeschool organization or team without penalty or mandatory participation requirements.(e) Implementation and oversight. - (1) The WVSSAC shall oversee the implementation of this section and provide guidance to member schools on how to incorporate homeschool team participation in a manner consistent with WVSSAC policies.(2) The WVSSAC shall ensure that all homeschool organizations wishing to participate meet the basic eligibility criteria outlined in this section.(3) Any disputes arising from the application of this section shall be reviewed by a WVSSAC-designated committee, with final decisions being subject to appeal to the West Virginia State Board of Education.(f) Effective date. - This article shall take effect on 30 days following its passage and approval by the Governor.(g) Severability - If any provision of this section is found to be invalid or unenforceable by a court of competent jurisdiction, the remainder of the section shall remain in full force and effect.